Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2404
Act; administration; commission;
powers.

The
commission shall administer the Postsecondary Institution Act. To fulfill
the purposes of the act, the commission may request from any department, division,
board, bureau, commission, or other agency of this state, and such entity
shall provide, such information as the commission deems necessary to exercise
its powers and perform its duties under the act.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 4.